Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2013
Graduate medical education or residency, defined.

Graduate medical education or residency means a program of supervised educational training, approved by the board, in a medical specialty at an accredited hospital, an accredited school or college of medicine, or an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine, that follows the completion of undergraduate medical education.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 671.